North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 1. Definitions, General Provisions and Remedies.
§ 130A-13.
Application for eligibility for Department medical payment program constitutes assignment to the State of right to third party benefits.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, by applying for financial eligibility for any Department medical payment program administered under this Chapter, the recipient patient or responsible party for the recipient patient shall be deemed to have
made an assignment to the State of the right to third party benefits, contractual or otherwise, to which he may be entitled to the extent of the amount of the Department’s payment on behalf of the recipient patient. Any attorney
retained by the recipient patient shall be compensated for his services in accordance with the following schedule and in the following order of priority from any amount of such third party benefits obtained on behalf of the recipient
by settlement, with judgment against, or otherwise from a third party:

First to the payment of any court costs taxed by the judgment;

Second to the payment of the fee of the attorney representing the beneficiary making the settlement or obtaining the judgment, but this fee shall not exceed one-third of the amount obtained or recovered to which the right of subrogation applies;

Third to the payment of the amount of assistance received by the beneficiary as prorated with other claims against the amount obtained or received from the third party to which the right of subrogation applies, but the amount shall not exceed one-third
of the amount obtained or recovered to which the right of subrogation applies; and

Fourth to the payment of any amount remaining to the beneficiary or his personal representative.The United States and the State of North Carolina shall be entitled to shares in each net recovery under this section. Their shares shall be promptly paid
under this section and their proportionate parts of such sum shall be determined in accordance with the matching formulas in use during the period for which assistance was paid to the recipient.

The Department shall establish a third party resources collection unit that is adequate to ensure collection of third party resources.

The Commission may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, in all actions brought by the State pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to obtain reimbursement for payments for medical services, liability shall be determined on the basis of the same laws and standards,
including bases for liability and applicable defenses, as would be applicable if the action were brought by the individual on whose behalf the medical services were rendered.

History.
1989, c. 483, s. 1; 1995, c. 508, s. 1.

§ 130A-14.
Department may assist private nonprofit foundations.

The Secretary may allow employees of the Department to assist any private nonprofit foundation that works directly with services or programs of the Department and whose sole purpose is to support the services and programs of the Department, and may provide
other appropriate services to any such foundation. No employee of the Department may work with a foundation for more than 20 hours in any one month. Chapter 150B of the General Statutes does not apply to any assistance or services
provided to a private nonprofit foundation pursuant to this section.

The board of directors of any private nonprofit foundation that receives assistance or services pursuant to this section shall secure and pay for the services of the Department of State Auditor or shall employ a certified public accountant to conduct
an annual audit of the financial accounts of the foundation. The board of directors of the foundation shall transmit a copy of the annual financial audit report to the Secretary.

History.
1991, c. 761, s. 37.3; 1993, c. 553, s. 40.1.

§ 130A-15.
Access to information.

Health care providers and persons in charge of health care facilities or laboratories shall, upon request and proper identification, permit the State Health Director to examine, review, and obtain a copy of records containing privileged medical information
or information protected under the Health Information Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) medical privacy rule, 45 C.F.R. Parts 160 and 164, that the State Health Director deems are necessary to prevent, control, or investigate
a disease or health hazard that may present a clear danger to the public health.

Privileged medical information or protected health information received by the State Health Director pursuant to this section shall be confidential and is not a public record under

G.S. 132-1

. The information shall not be released, except when the release is made pursuant to any other provision of law, to another federal, state, or local public health agency for the purpose of preventing or controlling
a disease or public health hazard or to a court or law enforcement official or law enforcement officer for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this Chapter or for the purpose of investigating a disease or public health hazard.

A person who permits examination, review, or copying of records or who provides copies of the records pursuant to subsection (a) of this section is immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed.

History.
2007-115, s. 1.

§ 130A-16.
Collection and reporting of race and ethnicity data.

All medical care providers required by the provisions of this Chapter to report to the Division of Public Health shall collect and document patient self-reported race and ethnicity data and shall include such data in their reports to the Division.

History.
2008-119, s. 1.

Part 2. Remedies.

§ 130A-17.
Right of entry.

The Secretary and a local health director shall have the right of entry upon the premises of any place where entry is necessary to enforce the provisions of this Chapter or the rules adopted by the Commission or a local board of health. If consent for
entry is not obtained, an administrative search and inspection warrant shall be obtained pursuant to

G.S. 15-27.2

. However, if an imminent hazard exists, no warrant is required for entry upon the premises.

The Secretary of Environmental Quality and a local health director shall have the same rights enumerated in subsection (a) of this section to enforce the provisions of Articles 9 and 10 of this Chapter.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.60; 2001-474, s. 19; 2006-255, s. 13.3; 2011-145, s. 13.3(rr); 2015-241, s. 14.30(v).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-255, s. 13.3, effective August 23, 2006, inserted “Part 4 of Article 5 and” near the end of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(rr), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Articles 9 and 10” for “Part 4 of Article 5 and Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(v), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Secretary of Environmental Quality” for “Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources” in subsection (b).

§ 130A-18.
Injunction.

If a person shall violate any provision of this Chapter, the rules adopted by the Commission or rules adopted by a local board of health, or a condition or term of a permit or order issued under this Chapter, the Secretary or a local health director may
institute an action for injunctive relief, irrespective of all other remedies at law, in the superior court of the county where the violation occurred or where a defendant resides.

The Secretary of Environmental Quality and a local health director shall have the same rights enumerated in subsection (a) of this section to enforce the provisions of Articles 9 and 10 of this Chapter.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.61; 2001-474, s. 20; 2006-255, s. 13.4; 2007-550, s. 2(a); 2011-145, s. 13.3(ss); 2015-241, s. 14.30(v).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-255, s. 13.4, effective August 23, 2006, inserted “Part 4 of Article 5 and” near the end of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2007-550, s. 2, effective August 1, 2007, and applicable to violations that occur on or after that date, in subsection (a), made a stylistic change, and inserted “or a condition or term of a permit or order issued under this Chapter.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(ss), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Articles 9 and 10” for “Part 4 of Article 5 and Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(v), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Secretary of Environmental Quality” for “Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources” in subsection (b).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

As to North Carolina prohibition of the dumping of waste materials such as bags of medical refuse,
especially that which may be hazardous or infectious, into the Atlantic Ocean, the authority of North Carolina with respect to dumping beyond three miles in the ocean which results in wastes entering State waters or being
deposited on the State shores and the extent State law applies to such events and what departments are responsible for enforcing such laws. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Robert B. Jordan, III, Lieutenant Governor, 58 N.C.
Op. Att'y Gen. 57 (1988).

§ 130A-19.
Abatement of public health nuisance.

If the Secretary or a local health director determines that a public health nuisance exists, the Secretary or a local health director may issue an order of abatement directing the owner, lessee, operator or other person in control of the property to take
any action necessary to abate the public health nuisance. If the person refuses to comply with the order, the Secretary or the local health director may institute an action in the superior court of the county where the public health
nuisance exists to enforce the order. The action shall be calendared for trial within 60 days after service of the complaint upon the defendant. The court may order the owner to abate the nuisance or direct the Secretary or the
local health director to abate the nuisance. If the Secretary or the local health director is ordered to abate the nuisance, the Department or the local health department shall have a lien on the property for the costs of the abatement
of the nuisance in the nature of a mechanic’s and materialmen’s lien as provided in Chapter 44A of the General Statutes and the lien may be enforced as provided therein.

The Secretary of Environmental Quality and a local health director shall have the same rights enumerated in subsection (a) of this section to enforce the provisions of Articles 9 and 10 of this Chapter.

History.
1893, c. 214, s. 22; Rev., ss. 3446, 4450; 1911, c. 62, ss. 12, 13; 1913, c. 181, s. 3; C.S., ss. 7071, 7072; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.62; 2006-255, s. 13.5; 2011-145, s. 13.3(tt); 2015-241,
s. 14.30(v).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-255, s. 13.5, effective August 23, 2006, inserted “Part 4 of Article 5 and” near the end of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(tt), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Articles 9 and 10” for “Part 4 of Article 5 and Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(v), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Secretary of Environmental Quality” for “Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources” in subsection (b).

§ 130A-20.
Abatement of an imminent hazard. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

If the Secretary or a local health director determines that an imminent hazard exists, the Secretary or a local health director may order the owner, lessee, operator, or other person in control of the property to abate the imminent hazard or may, after
notice to or reasonable attempt to notify the owner, lessee, operator, or other person in control of the property enter upon any property and take any action necessary to abate the imminent hazard. If the Secretary or a local health
director abates the imminent hazard, the Department or the local health department shall have a lien on the property of the owner, lessee, operator, or other person in control of the property where the imminent hazard existed for
the cost of the abatement of the imminent hazard. The lien may be enforced in accordance with procedures provided in Chapter 44A of the General Statutes. The lien may be defeated by a showing that an imminent hazard did not exist
at the time the Secretary or the local health director took the action. The owner, lessee, operator, or any other person against whose property the lien has been filed may defeat the lien by showing that that person was not culpable
in the creation of the imminent hazard.

The Secretary of Environmental Quality and a local health director shall have the same rights enumerated in subsection (a) of this section to enforce the provisions of Articles 9 and 10 of this Chapter.

History.
1893, c. 214, s. 22; Rev., ss. 3446, 4450; 1911, c. 62, ss. 12, 13; 1913, c. 181, s. 3; C.S., ss. 7071, 7072; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.63; 2002-179, s. 6; 2006-255, s. 13.6; 2011-145, s.
13.3(uu); 2015-241, s. 14.30(v).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-255, s. 13.6, effective August 23, 2006, inserted “Part 4 of Article 5 and” near the end of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(uu), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Articles 9 and 10” for “Part 4 of Article 5 and Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(v), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Secretary of Environmental Quality” for “Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources” in subsection (b).

§ 130A-20.
Abatement of an imminent hazard. [Effective January 1, 2023]

If a local health director determines that an imminent hazard exists, the local health director may order the owner, lessee, operator, or other person in control of a specific identified property to abate the imminent hazard or may, after notice to or
reasonable attempt to notify the owner, lessee, operator, or other person in control of the property enter upon the specific identified property and take any action necessary to abate the imminent hazard. If the local health director
abates the imminent hazard, the local health department shall have a lien on the property of the owner, lessee, operator, or other person in control of the specific identified property where the imminent hazard existed for the
cost of the abatement of the imminent hazard. The lien may be enforced in accordance with procedures provided in Chapter 44A of the General Statutes. The lien may be defeated by a showing that an imminent hazard did not exist at
the time the local health director took the action. The owner, lessee, operator, or any other person against whose property the lien has been filed may defeat the lien by showing that that person was not culpable in the creation
of the imminent hazard.

The local health director shall have the same rights enumerated in subsection (a) of this section to enforce the provisions of Articles 9 and 10 of this Chapter.

The Secretary shall have the authority to determine that a class or category of property uses presents a statewide imminent hazard. For a period of no more than seven calendar days, the Secretary may order owners, operators, or other persons in control
of that class or category of property uses to abate the statewide imminent hazard. If the Secretary has notified the Governor, and the Governor has received the concurrence of the Council of State, such order may be extended for
up to 30 days at a time. The Secretary may, after notice to or reasonable attempt to notify the owners, operators, or other persons in control of a specific property not complying with the order of abatement, enter upon the property
and take any action necessary to abate the imminent hazard. If the Secretary’s orders under this subsection would extend the application of the class or categories of properties in areas, when combined, to statewide application,
the Secretary shall notify the Governor, and the Governor shall seek the concurrence of the Council of State in accordance with this subsection prior to extension of any of the orders.

The Secretary of Environmental Quality, in accordance with subsection (c) of this section, may enforce the provisions of Articles 9 and 10 of this Chapter.

For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

Concurrence of the Council of State. — As defined in G.S. 166A-19.3(2d).

Statewide. — Two-thirds or more of the counties in this State.

History.
1893, c. 214, s. 22; Rev., ss. 3446, 4450; 1911, c. 62, ss. 12, 13; 1913, c. 181, s. 3; C.S., ss. 7071, 7072; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.63; 2002-179, s. 6; 2006-255, s. 13.6; 2011-145, s.
13.3(uu); 2015-241, s. 14.30(v); 2021-180, s. 19E.6(d).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19E.6(f), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19E.6(d), effective January 1, 2023, and applicable to the exercise of power under a state of emergency or declaration of emergency existing on or after
that date or any order of abatement issued on or after that date, and further provides: “Any power exercised under a state of emergency or declaration of emergency existing on that date that would require a concurrence of the Council
of State under

G.S. 166A-19.20

or

G.S. 166A-19.30

, as amended by this section, shall expire two days after this section becomes law unless a concurrence of the Council of State is sought and received in accordance with

G.S. 166A-19.20

or

G.S. 166A-19.30

, as amended by this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-255, s. 13.6, effective August 23, 2006, inserted “Part 4 of Article 5 and” near the end of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(uu), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Articles 9 and 10” for “Part 4 of Article 5 and Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(v), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Secretary of Environmental Quality” for “Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19E.6(d), in subsection (a), rewrote the first and second sentences, and deleted “the Secretary or” preceding “the local health director” in the fourth sentence; deleted “Secretary of Environmental Quality and a” following “The”
in subsection (b); and added subsections (c), (d) and (e). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 130A-20.01.
Action for the recovery of costs of hazardous materials emergency medical response.

A person who causes the release of a hazardous material that results in the activation of one or more State Medical Assistance Teams (SMATs) or the Epidemiology Section of the Division of Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services shall
be liable for all reasonable costs incurred by each team or the Epidemiology Section that responds to or mitigates the incident. The Secretary of Health and Human Services shall invoice the person liable for the hazardous materials
release and, in the event of nonpayment, may institute an action to recover those costs in the superior court of the county in which the release occurred.

History.
2007-107, s. 3.1(b).

§ 130A-21.
Embargo.

In addition to the authority of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services pursuant to

G.S. 106-125

, the Secretary or a local health director has authority to exercise embargo authority concerning food or drink pursuant to

G.S. 106-125(a)

, (b) and (c) when the food or drink is in an establishment that is subject to regulation by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to this Chapter, that is subject to rules adopted by the Commission,
or that is the subject of an investigation pursuant to

G.S. 130A-144

; however, no such action shall be taken in any establishment or part of an establishment that is under inspection or otherwise regulated by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services or the United States
Department of Agriculture other than the part of the establishment that is subject to regulation by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to this Chapter. Any action under this section shall only be taken by, or
after consultation with, Department of Health and Human Services regional environmental health specialists, or the Director of the Division of Public Health or the Director’s designee, in programs regulating food and drink pursuant
to this Chapter or in programs regulating food and drink that are subject to rules adopted by the Commission. Authority under this section shall not be delegated to individual environmental health specialists in local health departments
otherwise authorized and carrying out laws and rules pursuant to

G.S. 130A-4

. When any action is taken pursuant to this section, the Department of Health and Human Services or the local health director shall immediately notify the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. For the
purposes of this subsection, all duties and procedures in

G.S. 106-125

shall be carried out by the Secretary of Health and Human Services or the local health director and shall not be required to be carried out by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. It shall be unlawful
for any person to remove or dispose of the food or drink by sale or otherwise without the permission of a Department of Health and Human Services regional environmental health specialist, the Director of the Division of Public
Health or the Director’s designee, the local health director, or a duly authorized agent of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, or by the court in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 106-125.

Recodified as

G.S. 106-266.36

by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(s), effective July 1, 2011.

Recodified as

G.S. 113-221.4

by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(ttt), effective July 1, 2011.

Nothing in this section is intended to limit the embargo authority of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The Department of Health and Human Services and the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services are authorized to enter agreements
respecting the duties and responsibilities of each agency in the exercise of their embargo authority.

For the purpose of this section, a food or drink is adulterated if the food or drink is deemed adulterated under

G.S. 106-129

; and food or drink is misbranded if it is deemed misbranded under

G.S. 106-130

.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1997-261, s. 109; 1997-443, s. 11A.63A; 2006-80, s. 1; 2007-7, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 13.3(s), (vv), (ww), (ttt).

§ 130A-22.
Administrative penalties.

The Secretary of Environmental Quality may impose an administrative penalty on a person who violates Article 9 of this Chapter, rules adopted by the Environmental Management Commission pursuant to Article 9, or any term or condition of a permit or order
issued under Article 9. Each day of a continuing violation shall constitute a separate violation. The penalty shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per day in the case of a violation involving nonhazardous waste.
The penalty shall not exceed thirty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($32,500) per day in the case of a first violation involving hazardous waste as defined in

G.S. 130A-290

or involving the disposal of medical waste as defined in

G.S. 130A-290

in or upon water in a manner that results in medical waste entering waters or lands of the State; and shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per day for a second or further violation involving the disposal
of medical waste as defined in G.S. 130A-290 in or upon water in a manner that results in medical waste entering waters or lands of the State. The penalty shall not exceed thirty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($32,500) per
day for a violation involving a voluntary remedial action implemented pursuant to G.S. 130A-310.9(c) or a violation of the rules adopted pursuant to G.S. 130A-310.12(b). For violations of Part 7 of Article 9 of this Chapter and
G.S. 130A-309.10(m): (i) a warning shall be issued for a first violation; (ii) the penalty shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) for a second violation; and (iii) the penalty shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00)
for subsequent violations. If a person fails to pay a civil penalty within 60 days after the final agency decision or court order has been served on the violator, the Secretary of Environmental Quality shall request the Attorney
General to institute a civil action in the superior court of any county in which the violator resides or has his or its principal place of business to recover the amount of the assessment. Such civil actions must be filed within
three years of the date the final agency decision or court order was served on the violator.

(a1) Part 5 of Article 21A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes shall apply to the determination of civil liability or penalty pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

The Secretary of Environmental Quality may impose an administrative penalty on a person who violates

G.S. 130A-325

. Each day of a continuing violation shall constitute a separate violation. The penalty shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each day the violation continues.

(b1) The Secretary may impose an administrative penalty on a person who violates Article 19 of this Chapter or a rule adopted pursuant to that Article. Except as provided in subsection (b2) of this section, the penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars
($1,000) per day per violation. Until the Department has notified the person of the violation, a continuing violation shall be treated as one violation. Each day thereafter of a continuing violation shall be treated as a separate
violation.In determining the amount of a penalty under this subsection or subsection (b2) of this section, the Secretary shall consider all of the following factors:

The degree and extent of harm to the natural resources of the State, to the public health, or to private property resulting from the violation.

The duration and gravity of the violation.

The effect on air quality.

The cost of rectifying the damage.

The amount of money the violator saved by noncompliance.

The prior record of the violator in complying or failing to comply with Article 19 of this Chapter or a rule adopted pursuant to that Article.

The cost to the State of the enforcement procedures.

If applicable, the size of the renovation and demolition involved in the violation.

(b2) The penalty for violations of the asbestos NESHAP for demolition and renovation, as defined in

G.S. 130A-444

, shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day per violation. Until the Department has provided the person with written notification of the violation of the asbestos NESHAP for demolition
and renovation that describes the violation, recommends a general course of action, and establishes a time frame in which to correct the violations, a continuing violation shall be treated as one violation. Each day
thereafter of a continuing violation shall be treated as a separate violation. A violation of the asbestos NESHAP for demolition and renovation is not considered to continue during the period a person who has received
the notice of violation is following the general course of action and complying with the time frame set forth in the notice of violation.

(b3) The Secretary may impose an administrative penalty on a person who violates Article 19A or 19B of this Chapter or any rules adopted pursuant to Article 19A or 19B of this Chapter. Each day of a continuing violation is a separate violation. The penalty
shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day the violation continues for Article 19A of this Chapter. The penalty shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day the violation continues
for Article 19B of this Chapter. The penalty authorized by this section does not apply to a person who is not required to be certified under Article 19A or 19B.

The Secretary may impose an administrative penalty on a person who willfully violates Article 11 of this Chapter, rules adopted by the Commission pursuant to Article 11 or any condition imposed upon a permit issued under Article 11. An administrative
penalty may not be imposed upon a person who establishes that neither the site nor the system may be improved or a new system installed so as to comply with Article 11 of this Chapter. Each day of a continuing violation shall constitute
a separate violation. The penalty shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per day in the case of a wastewater collection, treatment and disposal system with a design daily flow of no more than 480 gallons or in the case of any
system serving a single one-family dwelling. The penalty shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300.00) per day in the case of a wastewater collection, treatment and disposal system with a design daily flow of more than 480 gallons
which does not serve a single one-family dwelling.

(c1)
The Secretary may impose a monetary penalty on a vendor who violates rules adopted by the Commission pursuant to Article 13 of this Chapter when the Secretary determines that disqualification would result in hardship
to participants in the Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) program. The penalty shall be calculated using the following formula: multiply five percent (5%) times the average dollar amount of the vendor’s monthly redemptions
of WIC food instruments for the 12-month period immediately preceding disqualification, then multiply that product by the number of months of the disqualification period determined by the Secretary.

In determining the amount of the penalty in subsections (a), (b) and (c), the Secretary and the Secretary of Environmental Quality shall consider all of the following factors:

Type of violation.

Type of waste involved.

Duration of the violation.

Cause (whether resulting from a negligent, reckless, or intentional act or omission).

Potential effect on public health and the environment.

Effectiveness of responsive measures taken by the violator.

Damage to private property.

The degree and extent of harm caused by the violation.

Cost of rectifying any damage.

The amount of money the violator saved by noncompliance.

The violator’s previous record in complying or not complying with the provisions of Article 9 of this Chapter, Article 11 of this Chapter, or

G.S. 130A-325

, and any regulations adopted thereunder, as applicable to the violation in question.

A person contesting a penalty shall, by filing a petition pursuant to

G.S. 150B-23(a)

not later than 30 days after receipt by the petitioner of the document which constitutes agency action, be entitled to an administrative hearing and judicial review in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General
Statutes, the Administrative Procedure Act.

The Commission shall adopt rules concerning the imposition of administrative penalties pursuant to this section that are under authority of the Secretary, and the Environmental Management Commission shall adopt rules concerning the imposition of administrative
penalties pursuant to this section that are under authority of the Secretary of Environmental Quality.

The Secretary or the Secretary of Environmental Quality may bring a civil action in the superior court of the county where the violation occurred or where the defendant resides to recover the amount of an administrative penalty authorized under this section
whenever a person:

Who has not requested an administrative hearing in accordance with subsection (e) of this section fails to pay the penalty within 60 days after being notified of the penalty; or

Who has requested an administrative hearing fails to pay the penalty within 60 days after service of a written copy of the final agency decision.

A local health director may impose an administrative penalty on any person who willfully violates the wastewater collection, treatment, and disposal rules of the local board of health adopted pursuant to

G.S. 130A-335(c)

or who willfully violates a condition imposed upon a permit issued under the approved local rules. An administrative penalty may not be imposed upon a person who establishes that neither the site nor the system may
be improved or a new system installed so as to comply with Article 11 of this Chapter. The local health director shall establish and recover the amount of the administrative penalty in accordance with subsections (d) and (g). Each
day of a continuing violation shall constitute a separate violation. The penalty shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per day in the case of a wastewater collection, treatment and disposal system with a design daily flow of
no more than 480 gallons or in the case of any system serving a single one-family dwelling. The penalty shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300.00) per day in the case of a wastewater collection, treatment and disposal system
with a design daily flow of more than 480 gallons which does not serve a single one-family dwelling. A person contesting a penalty imposed under this subsection shall be entitled to an administrative hearing and judicial review
in accordance with

G.S. 130A-24

. A local board of health shall adopt rules concerning the imposition of administrative penalties under this subsection.

(h1) A local health director may take the following actions and may impose the following administrative penalty on a person who manages, operates, or controls a public place or place of employment and fails to comply with the provisions of Part 1C of
Article 23 of this Chapter or with rules adopted thereunder or with local ordinances, rules, laws, or policies adopted pursuant to Part 2 of Article 23 of this Chapter:

First violation. — Provide the person in violation with written notice of the person’s first violation and notification of action to be taken in the event of subsequent violations.

Second violation. — Provide the person in violation with written notice of the person’s second violation and notification of administrative penalties to be imposed for subsequent violations.

Subsequent violations. — Impose on the person in violation an administrative penalty of not more than two hundred dollars ($200.00) for the third and subsequent violations.Each day on which a violation of this Article or rules adopted pursuant to this
Article occurs may be considered a separate and distinct violation. Notwithstanding

G.S. 130A-25

, a violation of Article 23 of this Chapter shall not be punishable as a criminal violation.

The clear proceeds of penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

The Secretary of Environmental Quality may also assess the reasonable costs of any investigation, inspection, or monitoring associated with the assessment of the civil penalty against any person who is assessed a civil penalty under this section.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 269, s. 2; c. 656; c. 704, s. 1; c. 827, s. 247; 1989, c. 742, s. 4; 1991, c. 691, s. 1; c. 725, s. 8; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 944, s. 11; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 686, s. 1; 1995, c.
504, s. 8; 1997-443, s. 11A.64; 1997-523, s. 2; 1998-215, s. 54(a); 2001-474, s. 21; 2002-154, s. 1; 2007-550, ss. 3(a), 4(a); 2009-27, s. 2; 2009-163, s. 2; 2009-488, s. 2; 2010-180, s. 14(c); 2011-145, s. 13.3(xx); 2013-378, s. 7;
2013-413, s. 49; 2015-241, s. 14.30(v); 2017-209, s. 19(b); 2020-74, s. 12(b).

§ 130A-23.
Suspension and revocation of permits and program participation.

The Secretary may suspend or revoke a permit issued under this Chapter upon a finding that a violation of the applicable provisions of this Chapter, the rules of the Commission or a condition imposed upon the permit has occurred. A permit may also be
suspended or revoked upon a finding that its issuance was based upon incorrect or inadequate information that materially affected the decision to issue the permit.

The Secretary may suspend or revoke a person’s participation in a program administered under this Chapter upon a finding that a violation of the applicable provisions of this Chapter or the rules of the Commission has occurred. Program participation may
also be suspended or revoked upon a finding that participation was based upon incorrect or inadequate information that materially affected the decision to grant program participation.

A person shall be given notice that there has been a tentative decision to suspend or revoke the permit or program participation and that an administrative hearing will be held in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Administrative
Procedure Act, at which time the person may challenge the tentative decision.

A permit shall be suspended or revoked immediately if a violation of the Chapter, the rules or a condition imposed upon the permit presents an imminent hazard. An operation permit issued pursuant to

G.S. 130A-281

shall be immediately suspended for failure of a public swimming pool to maintain minimum water quality or safety standards or design and construction standards pertaining to the abatement of suction hazards which
result in an unsafe condition. A permit issued pursuant to

G.S. 130A-248

shall be revoked immediately for failure of an establishment to maintain a minimum grade of C. The Secretary of Environmental Quality shall immediately give notice of the suspension or revocation and the right of
the permit holder or program participant to appeal the suspension or revocation under

G.S. 150B-23

.

The Secretary of Environmental Quality shall have all of the applicable rights enumerated in this section to enforce the provisions of Articles 9 and 10 of this Chapter.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; c. 438, s. 3; 1993, c. 211, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 732, s. 2; 1995, c. 123, s. 15; 1997-443, s. 11A.65; 2011-145, s. 13.3(yy); 2015-241, s. 14.30(v).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(yy), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Articles 9 and 10” for “Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12” in subsection (e).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(v), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Secretary of Environmental Quality” for “Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources” in subsections (d) and (e).